Massachusetts, session 194th, S1159.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
An Act to Provide for the Development of a Graduate Judicial Training School.
1.) Massachusetts, has been a leader in the advancement of law, while respecting the
great foundations of law, that goes back centuries. As time has evolved, societies, and laws, our
Commonwealth has allowed, encouraged, and benefitted from the creation of a number of high
quality accredited Graduate Law Schools.
2a.) In similar manner, as society has become more sophisticated, concerns have grown
regarding the quality of judges, and judging. Thus, it seems reasonable, logical, and appropriate,
of 3

that there be considered, the creation of a Graduate Judicial Training School. Such a school
should be established; at first to develop highest quality continuing education for current judges;
and shortly thereafter, to develop an entry-level, professional training academy, graduate school,
to train capable, and talented individuals to be judges.
2b.) Those eligible to be trained as judges, should be graduates of accredited Law
Schools, and study at least one, to two years, in advanced training on the nature of judging,
society, and effective and fair legal systems. Such training, shall include specific training
regarding the responsibilities, authorities, history, and appropriate training, relevant to making
decisions, as a judge, in The Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
3.) It should be the intent of developing such a Graduate Judicial Training School, to
facilitate the highest quality improvement of all judges, and legal hearing officers of The
Commonwealth, so that ultimately, all such appointments, are drawn from graduates of a
Massachusetts Graduate Judicial Training School, or a similar such qualifying program.
4a.) In order to move in the direction of establishing a Graduate Judicial Training School,
for The Commonwealth of Massachusetts, an Advisory Board for a Graduate Judicial Training
School, shall be appointed, consisting of:
Three (3) members appointed by the Governor, three (3) members appointed by the
Attorney General of Massachusetts; and one member each, who are the Deans of all accredited
Law Schools within Massachusetts (or their appointed designees).
4b.) This Advisory Board, shall select from its membership, a Chair, a Vice Chair; and
shall have such appropriate public hearings, in suitable, and several locations, across The
Commonwealth, as may facilitate significant, and appropriate public, and expert testimony.
of 3

5.) This Board shall convene, over a period of three (3) years, and make important
recommendations as to how to establish such a school, and also consider a long-term plan to
convert the judicial appointment process, and that for all legal hearing officers, to the
appointment of trained judges, educated by this process.
of 3